Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2405
Administrator-in-training, defined.

Administrator-in-training means a person who is undergoing training to become a nursing home administrator and is directly supervised in a nursing home by a certified preceptor.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 820.